src-fst-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Proper noun inflection
This file documents `affixes/propernouns.lexc`, the file for inflection of propernouns.

Livonian proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

**LEXICON PROP_ = this lexicon goes to K only


Stem lexica
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PŪ  contains pū: 12

LEXICON PROP_PŪ  contains pū: 12

LEXICON PROP_PŪ-SG  contains pū: 12






LEXICON PROP_KALĀ   contains  kalā:kalā 18

LEXICON PROP_KALĀ-SG   contains  kalā:kalā 18

LEXICON PROP_TUBĀ  tubā:tubā 19


















LEXICON PROP_VĒNA  vēna:vēna 37


LEXICON PROP_PADĀ  padā:padā 39





LEXICON PROP_JǬRA  jǭra:jǭra 44

LEXICON PROP_JǬRA-PL  jǭra:jǭra 44


LEXICON PROP_ĀITA  āita:āita 46

LEXICON PROP_ŪŠKA  ūška:ūška 47


LEXICON PROP_DADŽĀ  dadžā:dadžā 49






LEXICON PROP_KRǬIPA  krǭipa:krǭipa 55














LEXICON PROP_DUŅTŠ  : 70


LEXICON PROP_NIʼM  niʼm:niʼm 76

LEXICON PROP_NIʼM-PL  niʼm:niʼm 76


LEXICON PROP_TUP  tup:tup 79






LEXICON PROP_NǬʼGÕ  nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119



LEXICON PROP_KǬJ  : 123


LEXICON PROP_KIM  : 126

LEXICON PROP_KIM-SG  : 126


LEXICON PROP_VAʼIT  vaʼit:vait 128

LEXICON PROP_AMĀT  : 129

LEXICON PROP_KULTŪR  : 130

LEXICON PROP_VIĻȚ  : 132


LEXICON PROP_FAKT  fakt:fakt 135

LEXICON PROP_FAKT-SG  fakt:fakt 135


LEXICON PROP_ĀIGAST  : 140

LEXICON PROP_ANALĪZ  : 141


LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM-SG  nīʼem:nīʼem 142

LEXICON PROP_JAĻKŠ  : 143


LEXICON PROP_RŪʼTŠ  rūʼtš:rūʼtš 145





LEXICON PROP_SIDĀM  : 157

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG  : 158

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG  : 158

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND  : 159

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND-SG  : 159

LEXICON PROP_ȬʼDÕG  ȭʼdõg:ȭʼdõg 160





















LEXICON PROP_ĀNDÕKS  : 206




LEXICON PROP_PŪOL  : 216






LEXICON PROP_SŪR  : 222


LEXICON PROP_BIRKOV  : 224


LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ-SG  : 225








LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR  tidār:tidār 233


LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-PL  tidār:tidār 233

LEXICON PROP_PĒGAL  pēgal:pēgal 234

LEXICON PROP_APPÕN  appõn:appõn 235


LEXICON PROP_KĪNDÕR  kīndõr:kīndõr 237











* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
